Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.070

Authority to issue general obligation bonds, revenue bonds.

(1) To carry out the purposes of this chapter and notwithstanding RCW 39.36.020(1), a district may issue general obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any other outstanding nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness, equal to one and one-half percent of the value of taxable property within the district, as the term "value of taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. A district may additionally issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, together with any outstanding general obligation indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to five percent of the value of the taxable property within the district, as the term "value of taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VIII, section 6 of the state Constitution, and may also provide for the retirement thereof by excess property tax levies as provided in RCW 36.73.060(2). The district may, if applicable, submit a single proposition to the voters that, if approved, authorizes both the issuance of the bonds and the bond retirement property tax levies.

(2) General obligation bonds with a maturity in excess of forty years shall not be issued. The governing body of the district shall by resolution determine for each general obligation bond issue the amount, date, terms, conditions, denominations, maximum fixed or variable interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities, redemption rights, registration privileges, manner of execution, manner of sale, callable provisions, if any, covenants, and form, including registration as to principal and interest, registration as to principal only, or bearer. Registration may include, but not be limited to: (a) A book entry system of recording the ownership of a bond whether or not physical bonds are issued; or (b) recording the ownership of a bond together with the requirement that the transfer of ownership may only be effected by the surrender of the old bond and either the reissuance of the old bond or the issuance of a new bond to the new owner. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any coupons. Refunding general obligation bonds may be issued in the same manner as general obligation bonds are issued.

(3) Whenever general obligation bonds are issued to fund specific projects or enterprises that generate revenues, charges, user fees, or special assessments, the district may specifically pledge all or a portion of the revenues, charges, user fees, or special assessments to refund the general obligation bonds. The district may also pledge any other revenues that may be available to the district.

(4) In addition to general obligation bonds, a district may issue revenue bonds to be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 2005 c 336 s 7; 1987 c 327 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.